Utah statutes.
34-45-106.   Enforcement by attorney general.

(1)  The attorney general may bring an action to enforce this chapter and may request any relief that is provided for under Section 34-45-105, including a request for damages on behalf of any individual suffering loss because of a violation of this chapter.

(2)  Upon entry of final judgment for a cause of action brought under this section, the court may award restitution, when appropriate, to any individual suffering loss because of a violation of this chapter if proof of loss is submitted to the satisfaction of the court.

